North Carolina statutes. Chapter 161. Register of Deeds.
Article 3. Registers of Deeds’ Supplemental Pension Fund Act of 1987.

§ 161-50.
Short title and purpose.

This Article shall be known and may be cited as the “Registers of Deeds’ Supplemental Pension Fund Act of 1987.”

The purpose of this Article is to create a pension fund to supplement local government retirement benefits which will attract the most highly qualified talent available within the State to the position of register of deeds.

History.

1987, c. 792, s. 1.

§ 161-50.1.
Scope.

This Article provides supplemental pension benefits for all county registers of deeds who are retired from the Local Governmental Employees’ Retirement System or an equivalent locally sponsored plan as herein described.

The Board of Trustees of the Local Governmental Employees’ Retirement System shall administer the provisions of this Article.

The provisions of this Article shall be subject to future legislative change or revision, and no person is deemed to have acquired any vested right to a pension payment provided by this Article.

History.

1987, c. 792, s. 1; 2013-287, s. 2.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-287, s. 2, effective July 18, 2013, substituted “Board of Trustees of the Local Government Employees’ Retirement System” for “North Carolina Department of State Treasurer” in subsection (b).

§ 161-50.2.
Assets.

On and after October 1, 1987, each County Commission shall remit monthly to the Department of State Treasurer an amount equal to one and one-half percent (1.5%) of the monthly receipts collected pursuant to Article 1 of Chapter 161 of the General Statutes, to be deposited to the credit of the Registers of Deeds’ Supplemental Pension Fund, hereinafter referred to as the Fund, to be used in making monthly pension payments to eligible retired registers of deeds under the provisions of this Article and to pay the cost of administering the provisions of this Article. A County Commission’s submission of these amounts to the Department of State Treasurer constitutes a certification of the accuracy of these amounts.

The State Treasurer shall be the custodian of the Registers of Deeds’ Supplemental Pension Fund and shall invest its assets in accordance with the provisions of

G.S. 147-69.2

and

G.S. 147-69.3

.

History.

1987, c. 792, s. 1; 2007-245, s. 1; 2021-60, s. 2.2.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2007-245, s. 1, effective July 1, 2007, substituted “one and one-half percent (1.5%)” for “four and one half percent (4.5%)” near the beginning of subsection (a).

Session Laws 2021-60, s. 2.2, effective July 1, 2021, added the last sentence in subsection (a).

§ 161-50.3.
Disbursements.

Immediately following July 1, 1988, the Department of State Treasurer shall divide an amount equal to forty-five percent (45%) of the assets of the Fund at the end of the preceding fiscal year into equal shares and disburse the same as monthly pension payments to all eligible retired registers of deeds as of July 1, 1988, payable in accordance with the method described in

G.S. 161-50.5

, except that such pension benefit shall be computed for a six-months basis beginning with the month of July, 1988.

Immediately following January 1, 1996, and the first of January of each succeeding calendar year thereafter, the Department of State Treasurer shall divide an amount equal to ninety-three percent (93%) of the assets of the Fund at the end of the preceding calendar year into equal shares and disburse the same as monthly payments in accordance with the provisions of this Article.

The remaining seven percent (7%) of the Fund’s assets as of December 31, 1995, and at the end of each calendar year thereafter, may be used by the Department of State Treasurer in administering the provisions of this Article.

All the Fund’s disbursements shall be conducted in the same manner as disbursements are conducted for other special funds of the State.

If, for any reason, the Fund shall be insufficient to pay any pension benefits or other charges, then all benefits or payments shall be reduced pro rata for as long as the deficiency in amount exists. No claim shall accrue with respect to any amount by which a pension payment shall have been reduced.

History.

1987, c. 792, s. 1; 1995, c. 259, s. 2.

§ 161-50.4.
Eligibility.

Each county register of deeds who has retired with at least 12 years eligible service as register of deeds from the Local Governmental Employees’ Retirement System or an equivalent locally sponsored plan before June 30, 1988, and those who retire on or after June 30, 1988, but before July 1, 1991, and who have completed at least 12 years of eligible service as register of deeds is entitled to receive a monthly pension under this Article, beginning July 1, 1988. Effective July 1, 1991, each county register of deeds who retires with at least 10 years of eligible service as register of deeds is entitled to receive a monthly pension under this Article.

(a1)

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, effective January 1, 1996, any county register of deeds who separates from service as register of deeds after completing at least 10 years of eligible service as register of deeds, but who does not commence retirement with the Local Governmental Employees’ Retirement System, shall have the right to receive a monthly pension under this Article payable upon retirement with the Local Governmental Employees’ Retirement System.

(a2)

Each county register of deeds who is not eligible to retire with the Local Governmental Employees’ Retirement System solely because the county has not elected to participate as an employer with the Local Governmental Employees’ Retirement System and who has either (i) attained the age of 65, (ii) attained 30 years of creditable service regardless of age, or (iii) attained the age of 60 with not less than 25 years of creditable service, and who has completed at least 10 years of creditable service as a register of deeds is entitled to receive a monthly pension under this Article, provided that register of deeds is not eligible to receive any retirement benefits from any State or locally sponsored plan.

Each eligible retired register of deeds as defined in subsection (a), (a1), or (a2) of this section relating to service and retirement status shall be entitled to receive a monthly pension under this Article beginning with the month of retirement.

A county register of deeds who is otherwise eligible to receive a monthly pension under this Article shall cease to be eligible upon forfeiture of any retirement benefits under

G.S. 128-38.4

or

G.S. 128-38.4

A.

History.

1987, c. 792, s. 1; 1991, c. 443, s. 1; 1995, c. 259, s. 1; 1998-147, s. 1; 2007-245, s. 2; 2018-84, s. 2(c).

§ 161-50.5.
Benefits.

An eligible retired register of deeds shall be entitled to receive an annual pension benefit, payable in equal monthly installments, equal to one share for each full year of eligible service as register of deeds multiplied by his total number of years of eligible service. The amount of each share shall be determined by dividing the total number of years of eligible service for all eligible retired registers of deeds on December 31 of each calendar year into the amount to be disbursed as monthly pension payments in accordance with the provisions of

G.S. 161-50.3

. In no event, however, shall a monthly pension under this Article exceed an amount which, when added to a retirement allowance under the maximum allowance at retirement from the Local Governmental Employees’ Retirement System or an equivalent locally sponsored plan, is greater than seventy-five percent (75%) of a register of deed’s equivalent annual salary immediately preceding retirement computed on the latest monthly rate, including any and all supplements, to a maximum amount of one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500).

(a1)

A register of deeds eligible under G.S. 161-50.4(a2) shall be entitled to receive an annual pension benefit, payable in equal monthly installments as determined under the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, but reduced by an amount equal to the benefit that would be payable from the Local Governmental Employees’ Retirement System if the register of deeds had been a member of the Local Governmental Employees’ Retirement System and all of the years of local service were creditable to that System.

All monthly pensions payable under this Article shall be paid on the same business day of each month that benefits are paid from the Local Governmental Employees’ Retirement System.

Monthly pensions payable under this Article shall cease at the death of the pensioner and no payment will be made to any beneficiaries or to the decedent’s estate.

Monthly pensions payable under this Article will cease upon the full-time reemployment of a pensioner with an employer participating in the Local Governmental Employees’ Retirement System for as long as the pensioner is so reemployed.

(d1)

Monthly pensions payable under this Article will cease upon the ineligibility of a pensioner under G.S. 161-50.4(c) due to the forfeiture of any retirement benefits under

G.S. 128-38.4

or

G.S. 128-38.4

A.

Repealed by Session Laws 1989, c. 792, s. 2.11, effective for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1989.

Nothing contained in this Article shall preclude or in any way affect the benefits that a pensioner may be entitled to from any state, federal or private pension, retirement or other deferred compensation plan.

History.

1987, c. 792, s. 1; 1989, c. 792, s. 2.11; 1991, c. 50, s. 1; c. 443, s. 2; 1998-147, s. 2; 2007-245, s. 3; 2009-576, s. 1; 2018-84, s. 2(d).